Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB210.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of October 25, 2012 (P.L.1618, No.197), known as the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline Notification Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Required posting.(a) Sign.--An establishment shall post [a sign] signs containing information regarding the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline. Any other [establishment or] business may post a sign.(b) Posting.--[Establishments shall post at least one sign] An establishment shall post the signs required under subsection (a) in a conspicuous manner clearly visible to the public and 123456789101112131415161718 employees of the establishment. The signs shall be posted in all of the following locations:(1) In all restroom stalls.(2) On all restroom mirrors.(3) Above all hand driers and paper towel dispensers.(4) Other locations determined to be appropriate by the establishment.(c) Size, information and design.--The sign shall be no smaller than 8 1/2 by 11 inches.(1) The Department of Labor and Industry shall design the sign to include the following information:(i) The National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline at 1-888-373-7888.(ii) Victims of human trafficking are protected under United States and Pennsylvania law.(2) The Department of Labor and Industry may consult with human trafficking victim advocates to determine other information that may be included on the sign.(3) The Department of Labor and Industry shall design the sign to draw attention to the telephone number of the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline by showing the number in bold type and large font.(4) The sign shall be posted in English, Spanish and any other language mandated by [the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-110, 42 U.S.C. § 1973 et seq.)] 52 U.S.C. § 10301 (relating to d enial or abridgement of right to vote on account of race or color through voting qualifications or prerequisites; establishment of violation) in the county where the sign will be posted.(d) Notice.--20250HB0210PN0158 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The licensing authority shall provide notice of this section on its Internet website.(2) The Department of Labor and Industry shall provide the sign required by subsection (a) on its Internet website for establishments and other businesses to print as needed.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0210PN0158 - 3 - 123456